Hawaii statutes.
§668-16 Default. All parties who have
failed to plead or otherwise defend as provided by the rules of court shall,
when that fact is made to appear, be deemed to be in default, and their default
shall be entered. Such parties shall be deemed to have consented to such
partition or other disposition of the property as may be decreed in accordance
with this chapter. [L 1923, c 178, §16; RL 1925, §2776; RL 1935, §4755; RL
1945, §12465; RL 1955, §337-16; HRS §668-16; am L 1972, c 90, §11(q)]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 54(c), 55.

Case Notes

See 34 H. 232 (1937); 35 H. 262 (1939).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next